Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
General Provisions

249.005.
Purpose of group of sections within chapter.

The purpose of this section, KRS

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.050

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.101

,

249.102

,

249.103

,

249.104

, and

249.105

is to prevent the introduction and dissemination within this Commonwealth of insect pests, plant diseases, and weeds and to provide for their repression and control.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

249.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture.

“Director” means the director of the agricultural experiment station.

“Pest” means any insect, snail, slug, rodent, nematode, fungus, weed; and any other form of plant or animal life, or virus, bacterium, or other microorganism, except viruses, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in living man or other living animals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which the department declares to be a pest.

“Insect” means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals generally having the body more or less obviously segmented, for the most part belonging to the class Insecta, comprising six (6) legged, usually winged forms, as for example, beetles, bugs, bees, wasps, flies, and other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless and usually have more than six (6) legs, as for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and wood lice, and any other invertebrates which are destructive, constitute a liability, and may be classed as pests.

“Plant disease” means any fungi, bacteria, nematodes, protozoans, and viruses injurious to plants and plant products, and the pathological condition in plants and plant products, caused by fungi, bacteria, nematodes, protozoans, and viruses.

“Nursery stock” means all field or container-grown and native trees, sod, shrubs, herbaceous perennials, vines, cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, fruit-pits, and other seeds of fruit and ornamental trees and shrubs; also other plants and plant products for, or capable of, propagation, excepting field, vegetable, and flower seeds, bedding plants, bulbs, and roots.

“Nursery” means any grounds or premises on or in which nursery stock is propagated and grown, or from which nursery stock is collected for sale, or any grounds or premises on or in which nursery stock is being fumigated, treated, packed, or stored.

“Nurseryperson” means any person who owns, leases, manages, or is in charge of a nursery, and who propagates nursery stock.

“Nursery dealer” means any person or landscaper not a grower of nursery stock in this Commonwealth who:

Buys, sells, ships, or distributes nursery stock for commercial or monetary gain in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

Makes landscape plans or plants nursery stock and negotiates in the purchase of nursery stock for his clients; or

Transplants or moves nursery stock from place to place within this state for other persons for a consideration in payment for the nursery stock, for the planting of the nursery stock, or for both nursery stock and planting.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, or any organized group of persons whether incorporated or not.

“Weed” means any plant which grows where not wanted.

“Plants and plant products” means any trees, shrubs, vines, forage and cereal plants, and fruit, vegetables, roots, bulbs, seeds, wood, lumber, and all other parts of plants or plant products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; 1996, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 1, 1996.

249.020.
State entomologist — Deputy — Inspectors.

The chair of the Department of Entomology of the agricultural experiment station at the University of Kentucky shall be the state entomologist.

The state entomologist shall serve without pay other than his salary as an officer of the agricultural experiment station at the University of Kentucky. He shall be paid his traveling expenses.

The state entomologist shall appoint a deputy entomologist who shall have, as a minimum, a master of science degree in entomology, and nursery inspectors who shall have a B.S. or A.B. degree in plant sciences.

History.

1925a-1, 1925a-10: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

249.030.
Authority for administrative regulations — Publication of data.

The state entomologist, with the advice and consent of the director and the Commissioner, may promulgate, modify, and enforce administrative regulations and orders needed to carry out KRS

249.020

to

249.100

.

The state entomologist may publish bulletins, circulars, and reports containing information concerning inspections, insects, weeds, and plant diseases.

The state entomologist shall publish annually a list of the certified nurserypersons and nursery dealers licensed to do business in the Commonwealth and the list shall be furnished to interested persons.

The administrative regulations and publications shall be printed from time to time and furnished to interested persons.

History.

1925a-1, 1925a-10: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 4, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

249.032.
Authority to issue permit for shipment of injurious plant pests. [Renumbered.]

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). The statute originally assigned this number in the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts was renumbered as KRS

249.102

in codification.

249.040.
Establishment of quarantines.

The state entomologist shall, with the advice and consent of the director and the Commissioner, establish and maintain quarantines against the importation into this state and against the transportation within this state, of any trees, plants, and parts of plants, whether nursery-grown or not, from any state or from any county within the state where the plants or parts of plants are known to be affected with dangerous insect pests or plant diseases. He shall designate in announcements of quarantines the area quarantined, whether it constitutes a part of this state or of some other state.

History.

1925a-1: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

249.050.
Inspection of articles and premises — Diseased plants to be destroyed — Hindering inspection prohibited.

Whenever the state entomologist, his deputy, or a nursery inspector has reason to believe or is credibly informed that at any place within the state there has been introduced, or offered for sale, trees, plants, or parts of plants infected or infested with diseases or destructive pests that are likely to spread, he shall investigate the suspected articles and premises. If they are found so infested or infected, he shall notify the owner or possessor, in writing, of the nature of the infestation, specifying the insects, weeds, or diseases that have been found, and demand that within a reasonable specified time the affected articles or premises be disinfected, or destroyed by fire, under the direction of the state entomologist, his deputy, or a nursery inspector, and at the expense of the owner or possessor.

For the purpose of inspection and carrying out the provisions of this section, KRS

249.005

,

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.101

,

249.102

,

249.103

,

249.104

, and

249.105

, the state entomologist, his deputy, and nursery inspectors shall have free access to any field, orchard, garden, packing ground, building, cellar, freight or express office, warehouse, car or other vehicle, vessel, or other place where it may be necessary or desirable for them to go, or which it may be necessary for them to inspect, in the performance of their duties. The nurseryperson or nursery dealer shall provide assistance as necessary for any inspection or examination made in accordance with this section, KRS

249.005

,

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.101

,

249.102

,

249.103

,

249.104

, and

249.105

and administrative regulations. It shall be unlawful to deny this access to the state entomologist, or to offer any resistance to the officers and employees of the department, or to thwart or hinder the inspection by misrepresenting or concealing facts or conditions, or otherwise.

History.

1925a-2: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

249.052.
Nursery records — Prohibitions. [Renumbered.]

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). The statute originally assigned this number in the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts was renumbered as KRS

249.101

in codification.

249.055.
Inspection of shipments. [Renumbered.]

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.055

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.105

during codification.

249.060.
Nurseries and dealers to be licensed — Fees.

Every resident nursery or dealer selling nursery stock in this state shall annually file credentials with the state entomologist. If these credentials are satisfactory to the state entomologist, the director, and the Commissioner, the state entomologist shall, upon payment by the nursery or dealer of the fee set out in subsection (2) of this section, issue it a license authorizing it to do business in the state.

Payment of fees shall be made according to the following rates:

Class A nursery: nurseries that are actively growing nursery stock with the intent of selling shall pay an annual fee of forty dollars ($40), plus one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per acre.

Class B nursery: nurseries and garden centers that do not grow their nursery stock, but do overwinter a portion of their stock, shall pay an annual fee of forty dollars ($40).

Class A dealer: landscapers and businesses who do not grow or overwinter their nursery stock but whose primary business involves the sale or planting of nursery stock shall pay an annual fee of forty dollars ($40).

Class B dealer: businesses whose primary business is not the sale of nursery stock shall pay an annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person soliciting orders for or delivering trees or plants in this state shall carry with him a copy of his license which he shall show to prospective buyers, purchasers, county officials, or agents of the state entomologist, on demand.

History.

1925a-8: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 217; 1978, ch. 29, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 142, § 9, effective July 15, 1996.

249.062.
Nursery dealer’s license — Application — Exemption. [Renumbered.]

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). The statute originally assigned this number in the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts was renumbered as KRS

249.103

in codification.

249.070.
Entomologist to inspect nurseries and order management of plant pests — Shipment of affected stock prohibited — Exception.

All nurseries in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be inspected by the state entomologist, his deputy, or by a nursery inspector, once each year. The state entomologist may collect specimens of plant material in order to make cultures and positive identifications of plant pests. The state entomologist also may inspect nursery stock which is stored in cellars, heeling in grounds, or warehouses, to ascertain whether it is infested with insect pests or plant diseases. If, upon the inspection of any nursery, it appears that the nursery and its premises are not infected or infested with insect pests and plant diseases, the state entomologist shall issue to the nursery a certificate of inspection. The certificate of inspection shall be valid through June 30 of the following year. This certificate shall be prominently displayed in the main office of the building.

If the nursery and its premises are infected or infested with insect pests and plant diseases, the state entomologist shall notify the owners or managers of the nurseries, and shall also notify, in writing, the owner of any affected nursery stock to take such measures, on or before a certain day, for the management of plant pests as have been shown to be effectual.

The owner or manager of the affected nursery shall, within the time specified, take steps for the mitigation of plant pests.

No owner or manager of affected nursery stock shall sell or offer for sale, ship, deliver, or remove from a nursery any nursery stock affected with plant pests, until the stock has been officially inspected and a certificate covering it has been issued by the state entomologist.

The provisions of this section do not apply to florists’ greenhouse plants nor to flowers or cuttings.

History.

1925a-3, 1925a-4: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 29, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 142, § 10, effective July 15, 1996.

249.080.
Entomologist to issue certificate for stock free from insects and fungus.

When the state entomologist examines any trees, vines, plants or other nursery stock and finds the stock free from dangerously injurious insect and fungus enemies, he shall make out and deliver to the owner of the stock a certificate stating that he has inspected the stock and that he believes it to be free from dangerously injurious insect and fungus enemies. He shall keep in his office, for the information of anyone interested, copies of all valid certificates issued by him.

History.

1925a-5.

249.090.
Shipments to be accompanied by inspection certificate or license.

Whenever a resident nurseryperson or nursery dealer ships or delivers nursery stock, he shall send on each package or shipment so shipped or delivered a printed copy of the certificate or license issued to him by the state entomologist.

History.

1925a-6: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 12, effective July 15, 1996.

249.095.
False declaration of acreage and concealment of nursery stock prohibited. [Renumbered.]

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). The statute originally assigned this number in the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts was renumbered as KRS

249.104

in codification.

249.100.
Plants to bear inspection certificate.

Trees, plants, or parts of plants, whether nursery-grown or not, that are sold, shipped, or transported into this state shall bear a copy of a certificate of inspection from a state or United States government inspector. Transportation companies within the state shall notify the state entomologist at once when the trees or plants are received by them without a valid certificate. Nursery stock or other trees, plants, or parts of plants shipped into this state in violation of a state or United States quarantine may be seized and destroyed or returned to the shipper at the expense of the owner or possessor.

History.

1925a-7: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 29, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 142, § 13, effective July 15, 1996.

249.101.
Nursery records — Prohibitions.

A nurseryperson and nursery dealer shall maintain for one (1) year records of plant purchases, acquisitions, sales, or other distributions, excluding retail sales, and make the records available upon request to the state entomologist for inspection. No person shall withhold records, keep or file false records, inaccurately alter that person’s own records, or present the department any materially false records requested for the administration of records, or present the department any materially false records requested for the administration of this section, KRS

249.005

,

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.050

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.102

,

249.103

,

249.104

, and

249.105

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 7, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.052

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.101

during codification.

249.102.
Authority to issue permit for shipment of injurious plant pests.

When application is made, the state entomologist may issue a permit for shipment into or within the Commonwealth of injurious plant pests for research or diagnostic purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 8, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.032

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.102

during codification.

249.103.
Nursery dealer’s license — Application — Exemption.

Every nursery dealer engaged in selling nursery stock in this state shall, before selling, offering for sale, or delivering any stock, make annual application to the state entomologist and obtain a nursery dealer’s license as provided in this section, KRS

249.005

,

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.050

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.101

,

249.102

,

249.104

, and

249.105

. A separate license shall be required for each location and the license shall be prominently displayed at each place of business. A licensed nurseryperson who is also acting as a nursery dealer at the same location shall be exempt from procuring the nursery dealer’s license. The nursery dealer’s certificate shall expire on December 31 of each year. An application shall be made on forms to be furnished by the office of the state entomologist. The nursery dealer or agency is required to provide to the state entomologist the source of nursery stock offered for sale and this stock shall originate from a certified nursery. It shall be accompanied by a valid certificate of inspection of a federal or state inspector.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 11, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.062

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.103

during codification.

249.104.
False declaration of acreage and concealment of nursery stock prohibited.

No person shall make a false declaration of acreage or conceal any nursery stock from inspection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 14, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.095

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.104

during codification.

249.105.
Inspection of shipments.

All shipments of nursery stock entering the state, as well as intrastate shipments, may be inspected in transit or at their destination in order to determine whether or not they are moving in compliance with the provisions of this section, KRS

249.005

,

249.010

,

249.020

,

249.030

,

249.040

,

249.050

,

249.060

,

249.070

,

249.090

,

249.100

,

249.101

,

249.102

,

249.103

, and

249.104

. Factors influencing the decision to inspect nursery stock include origin of plant material, destination of and probable distribution subsequently, whether or not a quarantine or other requirements exist relative to either geographic area, plant species, or pests, and personnel and budgetary restrictions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 142, § 15, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). In creating the tables for the 1996 Kentucky Acts, this statute was assigned the number KRS

249.055

. The statute was renumbered as KRS

249.105

during codification.

249.110.
Keeping of tree with black knot prohibited — Nuisance. [Repealed.]

249.120.
County judge to appoint commissioners when black knot threatens. [Repealed.]

249.130.
Mayors of first and second-class cities to combat black knot. [Repealed.]

249.140.
Compensation and expenses of commissioners. [Repealed.]

249.150.
Commissioners to file acceptance — County clerk to record proceedings. [Repealed.]

249.160.
Commissioners to examine trees — Direct owner to destroy black knot. [Repealed.]

249.170.
Commissioners to destroy trees if owner fails — No liability for destruction. [Repealed.]

249.180.
Landholder to cut Canada thistles. [Repealed]

History.

200; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

249.183.
Canada and nodding thistle eradication areas, establishment, duties of agriculture department. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 11, §§ 1 to 3, 5, 6; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

249.187.
Thistles a public nuisance in eradication area, abatement. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 11, § 4; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

249.190.
Entry and cutting of thistles on failure of landholder — Exemption. [Repealed]

History.

201: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 247; 1968, ch. 11, § 8; 1990, ch. 433, § 1, effective April 10, 1990; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

249.195.
Thistle eradication on highway and utility rights-of-way. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 11, § 7; 1978, ch. 384, § 383, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 433, § 2, effective April 10, 1990; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

249.200.
Japanese beetle control. [Repealed.]

249.210.
European corn borer control — Commissioner may hire help and enforce regulations. [Repealed.]

249.220.
Department may impose quarantines on European corn borer. [Repealed.]

249.230.
Owner of products to destroy when so ordered by department — When department may destroy — Costs. [Repealed.]

249.240.
Fiscal courts may offer bounty for crows. [Repealed.]

249.250.
Termite and pest control industry — Licenses. [Repealed.]

249.255.
Examining board — Members. [Repealed.]

249.260.
License — Examination — Nonresident’s process agent — Fees. [Repealed.]

249.262.
Examination fees. [Repealed.]

249.265.
Advertisement by unlicensed operators prohibited. [Repealed.]

249.270.
Board may promulgate rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

249.280.
Notice and hearing on rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

249.290.
Right of entry upon property for inspection. [Repealed.]

249.300.
Revocation of license. [Repealed.]

249.305.
Suspension of license. [Repealed.]

249.310.
Licenses not transferable — Re-registration in case of death or change of business status of owner. [Repealed.]

249.317.
Hearing on denial, suspension or revocation of license. [Repealed.]

249.319.
Conduct of hearings — Testimony — Disobedience. [Repealed.]

249.320.
Notice of refusal or revocation of license — Rehearing — Appeal. [Repealed.]

249.321.
Termite and pest control industry — Revocation and suspension of licenses. [Repealed.]

249.323.
Procedure on appeal — Judgment — Appeal to Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

249.330.
Exemptions from license requirements. [Repealed].

249.340.
Disposition of license fees. [Repealed.]

249.345.
Limitation on prosecution under KRS 249.250 to 249.340. [Repealed.]

249.350.
Control and elimination of mosquitoes — Duty of Commissioner.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means that as defined in subsection (1) of Section

249.010

of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

“Department” means that as defined in subsection (2) of Section

249.010

of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

“Director” means that as defined in subsection (3) of Section 249.010 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

When it appears to the Commissioner that mosquitoes are present in any area of the state in sufficient numbers to warrant action, he shall conduct an immediate investigation of the causes thereof, and corrective measures necessary. The Commissioner shall undertake the control and elimination of mosquitoes in such area, utilizing whatever measures appear necessary so long as such methods in no wise damage the property of any person, and do not constitute a menace to the health of persons or livestock, including cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 213, §§ 1, 2, effective May 18, 1956; 2017 ch. 129, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.